Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Computer Crimes

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability for theft of, interference with, or unauthorized use of, computer programs, files or systems, 51 ALR4th 971.

What is computer “trade secret” under state law, 53 ALR4th 1046.

§ 6-3-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Access” means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of a computer, computer system or computer network;

“Computer” means an internally programmed, automatic device which performs data processing;

“Computer network” means a set of related, remotely connected devices and communication facilities including more than one (1) computer system with capability to transmit data among them through communication facilities;

“Computer program” means an ordered set of data representing coded instructions or statements which when executed by a computer cause the computer to process data;

“Computer software” means a set of computer programs, procedures and associated documentation concerned with the operation of a computer system;

“Computer system” means a set of related, connected or unconnected, computer equipment, devices or computer software;

“Computer system services” means providing a computer system or computer network to perform useful work;

“Financial instrument” means a check, draft, money order, certificate of deposit, letter of credit, bill of exchange, credit card or marketable security;

“Intellectual property” means data, including programs;

“Property” includes financial instruments, information, electronically produced data, computer software and programs in machine-readable or human-readable form;

“Trade secret” means the whole or a portion or phase of a formula, pattern, device, combination of devices or compilation of information which is for use, or is used in the operation of a business and which provides the business an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over those who do not know or use it. “Trade secret” includes any scientific, technical or commercial information including any design, process, procedure, list of suppliers, list of customers, business code or improvement thereof. Irrespective of novelty, invention, patentability, the state of the prior art and the level of skill in the business, art or field to which the subject matter pertains, when the owner of a trade secret takes measures to prevent it from becoming available to persons other than those selected by the owner to have access to it for limited purposes, the trade secret is considered to be:

Secret;

Of value;

For use or in use by the business; and

Providing an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage to the business over those who do not know or use it.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Computer fraud, 70 ALR5th 647.

§ 6-3-502.
Crimes against intellectual property; penalties.

A person commits a crime against intellectual property if he knowingly and without authorization:

Modifies data, programs or supporting documentation residing or existing internal or external to a computer, computer system or computer network;

Destroys data, programs or supporting documentation residing or existing internal or external to a computer, computer system or computer network;

Discloses or takes data, programs, or supporting documentation having a value of more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) and which is a trade secret or is confidential, as provided by law, residing or existing internal or external to a computer, computer system or computer network.

A crime against intellectual property is:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the crime is committed with the intention of devising or executing a scheme or artifice to defraud or to obtain property.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 197, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disclosure or use of computer application software as misappropriation of trade secret, 30 ALR4th 1250.

Copyright protection of computer programs under federal copyright laws, 70 ALR Fed 176.

§ 6-3-503.
Crimes against computer equipment or supplies; interruption or impairment of governmental operations or public services; penalties.

A person commits a crime against computer equipment or supplies if he knowingly and without authorization, modifies equipment or supplies used or intended to be used in a computer, computer system or computer network. A crime against computer equipment or supplies is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the crime is committed with the intention of devising or executing a scheme or artifice to defraud or to obtain property.

A person who knowingly and without authorization destroys, injures or damages a computer, computer system or computer network and thereby interrupts or impairs governmental operations or public communication, transportation or supplies of water, gas or other public service, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-504.
Crimes against computer users; penalties.

A person commits a crime against computer users if he knowingly and without authorization:

Accesses a computer, computer system or computer network;

Denies computer system services to an authorized user of the computer system services which, in whole or part, are owned by, under contract to, or operated for, on behalf of, or in conjunction with another.

A crime against computer users is:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the crime is committed with the intention of devising or executing a scheme or artifice to defraud or to obtain property.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-505.
This article not exclusive.

This article shall not preclude the application of any other provision of the criminal law of this state which applies, or may apply, to any violation of this article, unless the provision is inconsistent with this article.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

§ 6-3-506.
Computer trespass; penalties.

A person commits a computer trespass if he knowingly, with intent to damage or cause the malfunction of the operation of a computer, computer system or computer network and without authorization transfers or sends electronically into a computer, computer system or computer network or causes to be transferred or sent electronically into a computer, computer system or computer network any malware, or other data, program or other information which alters, damages or causes the malfunction of the operation of the computer, computer system or computer network or which causes the computer, computer system or computer network to disseminate sensitive information.

A computer trespass is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the resulting damages are less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00);

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the resulting damages are ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) or more.

Common carriers, internet service providers or other persons who supply the internet services over which the content is delivered shall not be prosecuted for violations under this section resulting from the acts of another.

For purposes of this section, “malware” means, but is not limited to, viruses, worms, trojan horses, rootkits, keyloggers, backdoors, dialers, ransomware, spyware, adware, malicious browser helper objects, rogue security software and other malicious programs used or designed to disrupt a computer operation, gather sensitive information, steal sensitive information or otherwise gain unauthorized access to a computer, computer system or computer network.

History:

2014 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 73, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 6-3-507.
Computer extortion; penalties.

A person is guilty of computer extortion if he knowingly and without authorization introduces, attempts to introduce or directs or induces another to introduce, any ransomware into a computer, computer system or computer network which requires the payment of money or other consideration to remove the ransomware or repair the damage caused to the computer, computer system or computer network by the ransomware.

Computer extortion is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

For purposes of this section:

“Computer or data contaminant” means any virus, worm or other similar computer program designed to encrypt, modify, damage, destroy, record or transmit information within a computer, computer system or computer network;

“Ransomware” means a computer or data contaminant, encryption or lock that restricts an owner’s access to a computer, computer data, computer system or computer network in any way. “Ransomware” does not include authentication required to upgrade or access purchased content.

History.

2017 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.